District of Columbia statutes.
38-1418

Payments by Mayor to medical and dental schools — Method of payment.

Payments under § 38-1416 by the Mayor may be paid in advance or by way of reimbursement at such intervals as the Mayor may find necessary and with appropriate adjustments on account of overpayments or underpayments previously made.

Jan. 5, 1971, 84 Stat. 1935, Pub. L. 91-650, title III, § 309
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
1973 Ed., § 31-928.
1981 Ed., § 31-1718.